Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4515.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 14k. (1) The digital photographic image and signature of a recipient of food assistance or cash assistance benefits must be captured or reproduced upon issuance of a Michigan bridge card. The department shall acquire equipment purchased or leased under this section under standard purchasing procedures of the department of technology, management, and budget based on standards and specifications established by the department. A digital photographic image and signature captured under this section must appear on the recipient's Michigan bridge card. If more than 1 individual is authorized by the department to use the Michigan bridge card, the digital photographic image and signature of all individuals over the age of 18 authorized to use the card must appear on the card. (2) As used in this section, "Michigan bridge card" means a debit card issued by the department to deliver food assistance or cash assistance benefits to the recipient through an electronic benefits transfer.